Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 2. Funds Consolidation

Cross references. —

As to receipt and disbursement of public funds, see art. 1 of this chapter.

As to funds of state institutions, see art. 3 of this chapter.

As to Taylor Grazing Act funds, see art. 4 of this chapter.

As to forest reserve funds, see art. 5 of this chapter.

As to investment of state funds, see art. 7 of this chapter.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

63C Am. Jur. 2d Public Funds § 1 et seq.

81A C.J.S. States §§ 223 to 229.

§ 9-4-201.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 2.

Editor's note. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 1, provided that the short title of the act was the Wyoming Funds Consolidation Act.

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 5 makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 9-4-202.
Legislative purpose.

This act reserves to the legislature the authority to establish funds outside of constitutional requirements. Provision is made to facilitate the handling of federal grants and other revenues which shall remain restricted according to the terms under which they are received. It is the policy of the legislature that all general governmental programs, activities and functions shall be subject to its review regardless of the sources of revenue available to the various departments, institutions or agencies except as otherwise provided.

History.

Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-557.2; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-502; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted the former first sentence, which read: “It is the purpose of this act to set forth legislative policy governing that phase of the state's fiscal procedures relating to financial funds.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-4-203(a)(xiii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 9-4-203.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Activity” means a specific and distinguishable line of work performed by one (1) or more organizational components of a governmental unit or capital outlay for the purpose of accomplishing a function for which the governmental unit is responsible;

“Appropriation” means an authorization granted by the legislature to make expenditures and to incur obligations for specific purposes;

“Earmarked revenue” means revenue which is dedicated by law for expenditure for specified activities, functions or programs and limited in the amount expended for the activities by the amount of money deposited to the credit of the governmental unit responsible for the specified functions and activities;

“Earned federal money” means any federal money receipt which is:

Reimbursement for state money disbursed under a contractual relationship;

Reimbursement of administrative overhead;

Reimbursement for general state overhead from the statewide cost allocation;

To finance a state activity that is being performed as a regular state funded activity;

Reimbursement for an overmatch of federal money for any reason for which there is no obligation to carry forward for additional state funding or requiring a refund to the federal government; or

The result of a lapse in a federal activity that does not require refunding to the federal government.

“Fiscal period” means the period from July 1 through June 30 of each year established for the purpose of determining the financial position and the results of a governmental unit except as otherwise specifically provided or authorized by law;

“Function” means a group of related activities aimed at accomplishing a major service or program for which a governmental unit is responsible;

“Fund” means an independent fiscal and accounting entity with a self-balancing set of accounts recording cash or other resources together with all related liabilities, reserves, and equities which are segregated for the purpose of carrying on specific activities or functions or attaining specific objectives in accordance with law;

“Fund accounts” means the accounts necessary to set forth the financial operations and the financial position of the various components of any fund;

“Lapse” means the automatic termination of an appropriation;

“Restricted revenue” means revenue which is dedicated by law for expenditure for specified activities, functions or programs and limited in the amount expended by legislative appropriation;

“Surplus” means the excess of assets of a specific fund or account over its liabilities;

“Unappropriated surplus” means that portion of the surplus of a specific fund or account which is not segregated for specific purposes;

“This act” means W.S.

9-4-201

through

9-4-224

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-557.2; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 9-557.3; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-503; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2009, ch. 90, § 2; 2015 ch. 195, § 2, effective March 10, 2015; 2019 ch. 186, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 204, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(v) inserted “specifically” following “otherwise” and “or authorized” preceding “law.”

The 2015 amendment,

in (a)(xiii), substituted “9-4-220” for “9-4-216” at the end.

Laws 2015, ch. 195, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Article 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2015.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(xiii), substituted "W.S.

9-4-201

through

9-4-223

" for "W.S.

9-4-201

through

9-4-220

."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2009, ch. 90, § 4 provides: “It is the intent of this act to impose a fiscal year of July 1 through June 30 on all governmental entities in this state, including all agencies, boards, commissions, institutions, instrumentalities, political subdivisions and special districts, no matter how formed, unless specifically exempted or otherwise authorized by law.
The intent of this act is to repeal any noncodified provision which conflicts with the provisions of this act, including but not limited to earlier adopted government reorganization acts.
Any entity required to change its current fiscal year of operation may elect to extend its current fiscal year or shorten its current fiscal year and commence its next fiscal year on July 1, 2009 or July 1, 2010, as it finds most convenient and efficient for its circumstances.”

Cited

in

Wyoming State Treas. v. City of Casper, 551 P.2d 687,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 1976).

§ 9-4-204.
Funds established; use thereof.

through (r) Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 2.

It is the intent of the legislature to establish uniform requirements for state government accounting and financial reporting in accordance with the generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB), or its successor bodies, so that the financial position and the results of operations of state government can be publicly available to citizens, legislators, financial institutions and others interested in such information. To implement these requirements:

The state auditor shall assign accounting for activities and programs of Wyoming state government to funds and classify each into fund types and account groups as specified in subsection (t) of this section in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;

All state agencies in all branches of government and specifically the state budget department, the governor and the consensus revenue estimating group shall use the fund types specified in subsection (t) of this section in preparing state budget documents, budget recommendations, revenue estimates and legislation;

The state auditor may, in consultation with the chief executive officers of the state agencies significantly involved in the operation of the fund, change the classification of funds between fund types when the operation of the fund changes or when there is a change in the application of generally accepted accounting principles;

The state auditor, after consultation with the chief executive officer of the state agency significantly involved in the operation of the affected fund or account, may merge, combine or segregate any fund or account that is or may be provided by law;

Within six (6) months after the end of each fiscal year, the state auditor shall publish a comprehensive annual financial report that shall conform as nearly as practicable to established governmental reporting standards. The financial statements shall be prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and shall contain certificates of examination by the department of audit or any other independent auditor that may be assigned; and

A deviation from generally accepted accounting principles shall not be made unless authorized by law.

As provided in subsection (s) of this section, the state auditor shall use the following fund types to classify state activities and programs for accounting purposes as specified:

Governmental fund types:

General fund - to account for the ordinary operation of state government, and shall receive all revenues and account for all expenditures not otherwise provided for by law in any other fund. General fund appropriations shall not be transferred to any other fund or account for expenditure except as otherwise provided by law;

Special revenue fund - to account for the proceeds of specific revenue sources, other than expendable trusts or for major capital projects that are legally restricted to be expended for specified purposes;

Capital projects fund - to account for financial resources to be used for the acquisition or construction of major capital facilities;

Debt service fund - to account for the accumulation of, and the payment of, general long term debt principal and interest.

Proprietary fund types:

Enterprise fund - to account for operations:

That are financed and operated in a manner similar to private business enterprise where the intent of the governing body is that the costs and expenses, including depreciation, of providing goods or services to the general public on a continuing basis be financed or recovered primarily through user charges; or

Where the governing body has decided that periodic determination of revenues earned, expenses incurred or net income is appropriate for capital accountability or other purposes.

Internal service fund - to account for the financing of goods or services provided by one (1) department or agency to other departments or agencies of the governmental unit, or to other governmental units, on a cost-reimbursement basis.

Fiduciary fund types:

Private-purpose trust funds - to account for any trust arrangement not properly reported in a pension trust fund or an investment trust fund under which principal and income benefit individuals, private organizations or other governments;

Investment trust funds - to account for legally separate governments pooling their resources in an investment portfolio for the benefit of all participants;

Pension and other employee benefit trust funds - to account for the assets held by state government as trustee for employee retirement systems;

Agency funds - to account for assets that state government holds on behalf of others as their agent.

College and university financial information - the financial data of state governmental colleges and universities that are considered to be part of the state government and that apply the provisions of the American institute of certified public accountants industrial audit guide. Audits of colleges and universities should be included with the financial data of the state government but may be presented separately from the fund types of the state government.

Other funds defined as follows shall be classified by the state auditor pursuant to subsections (s) and (t) of this section:

Highway fund - to account for all revenues the expenditures of which are constitutionally restricted to highway purposes or which are available for expenditure by the Wyoming transportation commission excluding general fund appropriations;

Game and fish fund - to account for all revenues received by the game and fish department the expenditures of which are restricted to wildlife purposes or which are available for expenditure by the Wyoming game and fish commission excluding general fund appropriations;

Permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund - to account for the proceeds from an excise tax levied by constitutional or statutory law, on the privilege of extracting or severing minerals designated by constitutional or statutory law. The proceeds of the fund are inviolate and constitute a permanent or perpetual trust fund which shall be invested, or loaned to political subdivisions of the state, only as the legislature directs. All income from the fund shall be deposited annually in the general fund;

Permanent land fund - to account for the resources received and held as trustee of the land grants made to the state by the federal government as provided by W.S. 9-4-305(b);

Permanent land income fund - to account for the income from the permanent land fund, land grants and income from other sources as provided by W.S. 9-4-305(c);

The excellence in higher education endowment fund - to consist of funds appropriated or designated to the fund by law, or by gift from whatever source. In accordance with Wyoming Constitution Article 15, Section 20, monies within the fund shall not be expended and may be invested in the same manner as other permanent funds of the state. Earnings from investment of monies within the fund are subject to the spending policy as provided in W.S.

9-4-719

and shall be distributed and expended as provided by law. Earnings in excess of spending policies shall be retained as provided by W.S.

9-4-719

;

Hathaway student scholarship endowment fund - to consist of funds appropriated or designated to the fund by law, or by gift from whatever source. In accordance with Wyoming Constitution Article 15, Section 20, monies within the fund shall not be expended and may be invested in the same manner as other permanent funds of the state. Earnings from investment of monies within the fund shall be distributed and expended as provided by law;

Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarship endowment fund — to consist of funds appropriated or designated by law, or by gift from whatever source. In accordance with Wyoming Constitution Article 15, Section 20, monies within the fund shall not be expended and may be invested in the same manner as other permanent funds of the state. Earnings from investment of monies within the fund shall be distributed and expended as provided by law. No state funds shall be appropriated or deposited into the fund;

Wyoming’s tomorrow scholarship endowment fund - to consist of funds appropriated or designated to the fund by law, or by gift from whatever source. In accordance with Wyoming Constitution Article 15, Section 20, monies within the fund shall not be expended and may be invested in the same manner as other permanent funds of the state. Except as otherwise provided under this paragraph, earnings from investment of monies within the endowment fund shall be credited to the endowment fund. Upon the endowment fund reaching a balance of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000.00), earnings from the investment of monies within this fund shall be credited to the Wyoming’s tomorrow scholarship expenditure account as created by W.S.

21-16-1902

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-557.3; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 9-557.4; Laws 1975, ch. 23, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-504; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1993, ch. 225, § 1; 1996, ch. 7, § 1; 1998, ch. 67, § 1; 1999, ch. 201, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 148, § 1; 2008, ch. 113, § 2; 2019 ch. 81, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 52, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, repealed former (a) through (r), establishing and providing the purposes of the following funds: general fund, earmarked revenue fund, federal revenue fund, trust and agency fund, debt service fund, clearance fund, highway fund, game and fish fund, permanent land fund, permanent land income fund, permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund, enterprise fund, intragovernmental fund, transportation enterprise fund, and transportation trust fund; and added (s) through (u).

The 2007 amendment,

added (u)(vi) through (u)(vii).

Laws 2007, ch. 148, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2007.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, twice substituted “W.S.

9-4-719

” for “W.S.

9-4-713

” in (u)(vi).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (u)(viii).

The 2021 amendment,

in (s)(ii), added “state” following “specifically the,” deleted “division of the” preceding “department” and “of administration and information” preceding “the governor and.”

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added (u)(ix).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 9-4-205.
Appropriations and expenditures.

The revenues and other resources of the general fund, the special revenue fund insofar as it contains restricted revenue, federal funds and the permanent land fund as provided by W.S.

9-4-310

are subject to legislative review and appropriation for each fiscal period.

Expenses required in administrative activities chargeable to accounts within the special revenue fund and the highway fund excluding the department of transportation shall be provided by legislative appropriation from the general fund. Monthly, as the general fund appropriations are expended, corresponding amounts shall be transferred from the proper accounts within the funds specified in this subsection to the general fund. The administrative expenses chargeable to these accounts shall be included in the governor’s budget to the legislature as provided by law.

The revenues and other resources in any funds created by this act which are not affected by subsection (a) or (b) of this section may be expended pursuant to law or agreement if in conformity with the requirements of the state budget department, if any.

Authority to spend enterprise fund accounts shall be based upon budgets submitted in the same manner as for other units of state government. The budgets shall be supported by complete financial and operating statements together with cost analyses and comparisons to provide a base for financial planning.

Authority to spend internal service fund accounts shall be based on the approved budget requests of the serviced units of state government. Additional authority to spend may be requested and shall be supported by financial and operating statements together with cost analyses and comparisons to provide a base for financial planning.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-557.5; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 1; 1975, ch. 23, § 1; 1976, ch. 26, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-505; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; ch 241, § 3; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), substituted “special” for “earmarked” and “federal funds” for “the federal revenue fund”; in (b), substituted “special revenue” for “trust and agency”; and in (e), substituted “internal service” for “intragovernmental.”

The 2021 amendment,

in (c), added "state" following "requirements of the," deleted "division of the" preceding "department" and "of administration and information" preceding "if any."

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-4-203(a)(xiii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 9-4-206.
Disposition of revenue; cash accounts; investment of monies held by state institutions.

Receipts of revenue and other resources that require allocation into more than one (1) fund or to more than one (1) governmental unit shall be deposited in an account for holding until allocated in accordance with law. All revenue and money received or held by a state governmental unit shall be placed in the appropriate fund except as otherwise provided. Except as otherwise provided by law, no bank accounts shall be opened or maintained nor shall revenue, cash, checks or other written instruments, notes, mortgages, securities, performance bonds or other similar obligations be held by any state governmental unit except the state treasurer.

Supplemental additions to approved budgets for acceptance and expenditure of federal funds authorized for acceptance by the governor after notice is provided to the legislature pursuant to W.S. 9-2-1005(g) and, if applicable, the additional requirements of W.S. 9-2-1005(g) have been met, shall be in writing, signed by the governor or his designated representative with copies to the state auditor and state budget department. Upon approval by the governor, federal revenue that is accepted and which will result in a saving or replacement of state monies to accomplish a budgeted activity or function shall be transferred to the general fund with appropriate explanation. If the provisions of W.S. 9-2-1005(g)(ii) or (iv)(A) or (B) are applicable, the joint appropriations committee shall meet as soon as feasible and in all events not less than ten (10) days after the legislature has received the request from the governor. The committee shall vote whether to recommend the legislature should meet in special session pursuant to Wyoming Constitution Article 3, Section 7 to consider the acceptance or expenditure of the federal funds. Upon receipt of the committee’s recommendation, the presiding officers of each house shall initiate a poll of the members of the legislature in accordance with rules of the legislature for calling itself into special session. The governor may not accept or expend the funds until the earlier of:

Certification by either the president of the senate or the speaker of the house to the governor’s office that a majority of the elected members of the Senate or House have not elected to call their body into special session;

Forty (40) days after the governor submitted his request to the legislature under W.S. 9-2-1005(g).

The state treasurer may establish cash accounts for state government units. The cash accounts may be for purposes of making change, for the payment of small local purchases, refunds under one hundred dollars ($100.00), or, in the case of the state fair, for any expenditures authorized by law. Cash accounts shall be reimbursed at least monthly by submitting a certified voucher supported by the documentation required by the state auditor for issuance of a state warrant from the appropriate accounts in the same manner as other vouchers are submitted for payment. The reimbursement warrant shall be paid from the appropriate account and charged to the budgeted expense classifications, if any. Money provided by this subsection may be placed in demand deposits for disbursement. All approved change and petty cash accounts shall be an accountable cash item within the state treasurer’s cash accountability and supported by receipts from the administrator of the state unit holding change or petty cash accounts.

The state treasurer may establish a cash account within his office to facilitate the processing and payment of cash refunds, or other fund cash disbursements, under one hundred dollars ($100.00). Money provided by this subsection may be placed in a demand deposit for disbursement. The cash account shall be reimbursed at least monthly by submitting a certified voucher supported by the documentation required by the state auditor for issuance of a state warrant from the appropriate accounts.

Excluding compensation earned by prisoners confined to a state penal institution, to the greatest extent possible all monies held by any state institution belonging to patients, residents or inmates of the state institution shall be deposited or held at the location of the institution, to earn the highest available rate of interest on an investment insured by the United States government or agency or any department thereof and to be available for withdrawal without penalty, and need not be accounted for within the agency fund. With the consent of the person owning the money or of any person legally responsible for that person’s financial affairs the monies may be invested in accounts or certificates of deposit insured by the United States government, agency or department which are for a fixed term and have a penalty for early withdrawal. Each chief administrator of an institution is accountable for all monies. An account shall be kept for each individual showing all receipts, disbursements and monies by type of account. To the greatest extent possible, all monies not invested in fixed term investments shall be deposited in individual savings accounts to accrue interest for each individual. Monies not so deposited shall be kept in a separate pooled demand account. The total receipts, disbursements and balances shall be reported monthly to the state treasurer and state auditor for disclosure in the state financial reports. Upon discharge all money plus accrued interest held on behalf of a patient, resident or inmate, excluding lawful charges, shall be returned to that person or a duly authorized person. If the patient, resident or inmate, or other duly authorized person, cannot be found, or in the event of death of the patient, resident or inmate, the money plus accrued interest, excluding lawful charges, shall after a reasonable effort to find and notify the heirs has failed, be transmitted to the state treasurer to be held or distributed as provided by W.S.

9-5-203

.

History.

Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-557.6; Laws 1975, ch. 109, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-506; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2009, ch. 168, § 208; 2020 ch. 65, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 124, § 2, effective April 6, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), in the first sentence substituted “an account” for “accounts within the trust and agency fund”; in (d), in the first sentence substituted “other fund cash disbursements” for “trust and agency fund cash disbursements”; and in (e), deleted “trust and” preceding “agency” near the end of the first sentence.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (c), in the first sentence, deleted “with the concurrence of the department of administration and information” following “The state treasurer”, and deleted the second sentence, which read: “The department of administration and information may prescribe a monetary limit for expenditures for small local purchases or refunds from any account subject to other provisions of law”; and in (e), in the sixth sentence, deleted “department of administration and information” following “state treasurer.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (b) added “after notice is provided to the legislature pursuant to W.S. 9-2-1005(b)” preceding “shall be in writing.”

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 56, § 3, in the first sentence of (b), added “state budget” preceding “department” and deleted “of administration and information” at the end.

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 124, § 2, in (b), substituted "9-2-1005(g) and, if applicable, the additional requirements of W.S. 9-2-1005(g) have been met" for "9-2-1005(b)" in the first sentence, added the third through sixth sentences; and added (b)(i) and (b)(ii).

Laws 2021, ch. 124, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 6, 2021.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 9-4-207.
Disposition of unexpended appropriations.

All unexpended general fund appropriations shall lapse as of the end of the fiscal period excluding appropriations for purposes as specified in subsection (d) of this section.

All unexpended federal funds appropriations and budget authorizations to accept and expend federal funds as provided by W.S. 9-4-206(b) shall be reviewed by the state budget department at the end of the fiscal period. The department may authorize amounts to be carried forward into the next fiscal period which are necessary to complete activities or functions in progress, for activities or functions not then started, and for purposes as specified in subsection (d) of this section. Federal funds not carried forward shall revert to the general fund unless federal requirements provide otherwise or unless otherwise provided by the legislature.

Unexpended appropriations from any funds created by this act not specified in subsection (a) or (b) of this section shall lapse at the end of the fiscal period and be accounted for as unappropriated surplus within the fund or account if applicable, excluding appropriations for purposes as specified in subsection (d) of this section.

Appropriations for the purposes specified in this subsection shall be excluded from reverting pursuant to subsections (a) through (c) of this section. Appropriations which do not revert pursuant to this subsection shall be expended only on the projects for which the funds were appropriated. Funds subject to this subsection are appropriations:

For capital outlays;

For information technology projects which have been certified by the state chief information officer as having a defined scope, defined process to ensure competitive bidding, and an identified need for continuing the expenditure beyond the applicable fiscal period from unexpended appropriations. The certification shall be provided to the state auditor prior to the end of the applicable fiscal period;

Which are specifically designated by law as not subject to reversion under this section.

In each even numbered year:

For purposes of reverting unexpended appropriations:

Not later than July 15, the state auditor shall provide to each affected agency a list of existing unexpended appropriations or authorizations from all prior fiscal periods;

Not later than August 15, each agency shall provide to the auditor a list of existing unexpended appropriations or authorizations for all prior fiscal periods and amounts which can be reverted;

Not later than October 1, the auditor shall revert any unexpended appropriation for which there is no legal authority to carry forward the appropriation into the next fiscal period.

For purposes of reporting unexpended appropriations:

Not later than October 15, the state auditor shall provide to each affected agency a list of existing unexpended appropriations or authorizations from all prior fiscal periods;

Not later than November 15, each agency shall provide to the state auditor the nature of each outstanding obligation, the authority to maintain any unexpended appropriation and a timeline for expenditure of funds to meet any outstanding obligation legally incurred.

Not later than December 1, the auditor shall:

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 8, § 2.

In consultation with the state budget department, report to the governor and joint appropriations committee on all unexpended appropriations or authorizations remaining after September 30. The state chief information officer shall be consulted for purposes of information technology projects within the report. The report shall include:

Identification of the provision of law initially appropriating the funds;

The amount of funds not reverted;

An explanation of why each amount did not revert and for each capital outlay or information technology project for which funds did not revert, a description of the project;

The anticipated date upon which the funds will revert;

For funds not reverted pursuant to W.S.

9-2-1008

, the fund type, purpose and timeline for expenditure of funds to meet any outstanding obligation legally incurred;

The account or fund to which the funds will revert.

For purposes of subsection (e) of this section funds within an account or fund established by codified statute as not subject to reversion or lapse at the end of a fiscal period shall not be considered as reportable funds.

The state auditor, in consultation with the state budget department, shall accommodate the department of transportation’s October through September fiscal period in implementing the reporting requirements of subsections (e) and (f) of this section regarding the disposition of unexpended appropriations while still identifying any reversions by October 1 of each even numbered year.

History.

Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-557.7; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-507; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2014 ch. 8, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2016 ch. 8, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (b), in the first sentence substituted “federal funds” for “federal revenue fund,” and in the third sentence substituted “Federal funds” for “The balance within the federal revenue fund.”

The 2014 amendments. —

The first
2014 amendment, by ch. 8, § 1, effective July 1, 2014, added (e) through (g).

The second 2014 amendment, by ch. 25, § 1, effective July 1, 2014, in (a), substituted “for purposes as specified in subsection (d) of this section” for “for capital outlays and except as otherwise authorized by law”; in (b), inserted “and for purposes as specified in subsection (d) of this section” and made stylistic changes; in (c) substituted “excluding appropriations for purposes as specified in subsection (d) of this section” for “except as otherwise provided by the legislature”; and added (d).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 8 § 1, effective July 1, 2016, rewrote (e).

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 8 § 21, effective July 1, 2016, repealed former (e)(iii)(A), which read: “Revert any unexpended appropriation for which the appropriation or authorization was mistakenly carried forward under the authority of W.S.

9-2-1008

or this section or for which the authority to not revert the unexpended appropriation no longer exists.”

The 2021 amendment,

in the first sentence of (b), added "state budget" preceding "department," deleted "of administration and information" preceding "at the end"; in the first sentence of (e)(iii)(B), added "state budget" preceding "department," deleted "of administration and information" preceding "report to the governor" and "interim" preceding committee"; and in (g), added "state budget" preceding "department," deleted "of administration and information" preceding "shall accommodate."

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-4-203(a)(xiii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”